Utah statutes.
78B-1-122.   Jurors and witnesses -- Justice court judge -- Certificate of
attendance -- Records and reporting.
(1)  Every justice court judge shall give to each person who has served before
him as a juror or as a witness in a criminal cause when summoned for the
prosecution by the county or city attorney, or for the defense by order of the
court, a numbered certificate, in which must be stated:
(a)  the name of the juror or witness;
(b)  the title of the proceeding;
(c)  the number of days in attendance;
(d)  the number of miles traveled if the witness has traveled more than 50
miles in going only; and
(e)  the amount due.
(2)  The certificate shall be presented to the county or city attorney. When
certified as being correct, it shall be presented to the county or city
auditor and when allowed by the county executive or town council, the auditor
shall draw a warrant for it on the treasurer.
(3)  Every justice court judge shall keep a record of all certificates issued.
The record shall show all of the facts stated in each certificate. On the
first Monday of each month a detailed statement of all certificates issued
shall be filed with the treasurer.
